Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 1 AIR QUALITY
12-9-10. Permit related fees; costs of public notice.

The owner or operator of any stationary source shall pay to the division as a condition of any permit required under this article or under Ga. L. 1967, p. 581, as amended, an annual fee, or its equivalent over some other period, sufficient to cover:

The reasonable cost of reviewing and acting upon any application for a permit under this article;

The reasonable cost incurred after July 1, 1978, of implementing and enforcing the terms and conditions of any permit issued under this article or under Ga. L. 1967, p. 581, as amended, regardless of whether the permit was issued before or after July 1, 1978; provided, however, such cost shall not include any court cost or other costs associated with any judicial enforcement action;

The reasonable cost of employing and training adequate personnel to implement the permitting program in accordance with this article;

The reasonable cost of acquiring the necessary equipment and facilities to implement the permitting program in accordance with this article;

Emissions and ambient monitoring;

Preparing generally applicable regulations or guidance;

Modeling, analyses, and demonstrations; and

Preparing inventories and tracking emissions.

The total amount of fees collected shall not be less than $25.00 per ton of emissions allowed in the permit of each regulated pollutant as defined in 42 U.S.C. Section 7661a(b)(3)(B)(ii) of the federal act; provided, however, that to the extent allowed under the federal act, the board may establish a lesser amount which may include fees based on actual emissions, if approved by the United States Environmental Protection Agency as fulfilling the requirements of the federal act. No fee shall be collected for more than 4,000 tons per year of any individual regulated pollutant emitted by any source or any group of sources located within a contiguous area and under common control. No fee shall be collected for the emission of carbon monoxide which is not a regulated pollutant as defined in 42 U.S.C. Section 7661a(b)(3)(B)(ii) of the federal act.

The fee collected shall be increased consistent with the need to cover the costs authorized in subsection (a) of this Code section by the percentage, if any, by which the Consumer Price Index for the most recent calendar year ending before the beginning of such year exceeds the Consumer Price Index for the calendar year 1989. For purposes of this subsection the Consumer Price Index is the average of the Consumer Price Index for all-urban consumers published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the Department of Labor, as of the close of the 12 month period ending on August 31 of each calendar year, and the revision of the Consumer Price Index which is most consistent with the Consumer Price Index for 1989 shall be used.

The director may reduce any permit fee required under this article to take into account the financial resources of small business stationary sources as defined under the federal act or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

The owner or operator of any stationary source shall, in addition to the fees provided for in subsections (a) through (c) of this Code section, pay any cost or expense associated with public notices or notifications required pursuant to this article or the federal act.

Collection of fees pursuant to this Code section shall preclude collection of any air quality control permit fees by any other state or local governmental authority.

Collection of fees pursuant to this Code section will not begin prior to July 1, 1992, and shall only apply to emissions occurring after January 1, 1991.

The General Assembly declares its intent that the fee provisions of this Code section shall be consistent with and shall meet the requirements of the federal act but shall not duplicate the fees charged thereunder. The General Assembly further declares its intent to ensure that any permit fee collected by the division shall be utilized solely to cover all reasonable direct and indirect costs required to support the permit program as set forth in the federal act.

(Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 10; Code 1981, §

12-9-9

; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1735, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Code 1981, §

12-9-10

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "article" was substituted for "chapter" in this Code section.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886,

§

1, effective July 1, 1992, redesignated former Code Section 12-9-10 as present Code Section 12-9-11.

12-9-11. Inspections and investigations.

For the purpose of (1) determining whether any person subject to the requirements of this article is in compliance with any standard or requirement imposed pursuant to this article, or (2) investigating conditions relating to air pollution or possible air pollution, where the director is in possession of information sufficient to form a reasonable belief that air pollution or possible air pollution in violation of this article is occurring or about to occur, the director or his authorized representative, upon presentation of his credentials, shall have a right to enter into, upon, or through premises of persons subject to this article or premises whereon a violation of this article is reasonably believed to be occurring or is reasonably believed to be about to occur, to investigate, sample emissions, and inspect for compliance with the requirements imposed under this article or to determine whether such a violation or threatened violation exists; provided, however, that this Code section in no way limits the authority of any other person or entity to inspect any source or facility as may be provided by the federal act.

(Code 1933, 88-907, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 581, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 11; Code 1981, §

12-9-10

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Code 1981, §

12-9-11

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "this article" was substituted for "the article" in two places near the middle of this Code section.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886,

§

1, effective July 1, 1992, redesignated former Code Section 12-9-11 as present Code Section 12-9-12.

12-9-12. Injunctive relief.

Whenever in the judgment of the director any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice which constitutes or will constitute an unlawful action under this article, he may make application to the superior court of the county in which the unlawful act or practice has been or is about to be engaged in, or in which jurisdiction is appropriate, for an order enjoining such act or practice or for an order requiring compliance with this article. Upon a showing by the director that such person has engaged in or is about to engage in any such act or practice, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order shall be granted without the necessity of showing lack of an adequate remedy of law.

(Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 13; Code 1981, §

12-9-11

; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Code 1981, §

12-9-12

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1.)

Editor's notes.

- Former Code Section 12-9-12, relating to delayed compliance orders, was repealed by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886,

§

1, effective July 1, 1992, and was based on Ga. L. 1978, p. 275,

§

13.

12-9-13. Proceedings for enforcement.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that a violation of any provisions of this article or rule or regulation of the Board of Natural Resources or any order of the director has occurred, he may issue such orders and take such actions as are authorized by this article to require such person or persons to remedy the violation so as to be in compliance with this article. Any order issued by the director under this Code section shall be signed by the director. Any such order shall become final unless the person or persons named therein request in writing a hearing before the department pursuant to Code Section 12-9-15.

(Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 14; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "article" was substituted for "chapter" in this Code section.

12-9-14. Powers of director in situations involving imminent and substantial danger to public health.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the director, upon receipt of evidence that a source or facility or combination of sources or facilities is presenting imminent and substantial danger to the health of persons, may bring an action as provided in Code Section 12-9-12 immediately to restrain any person causing or contributing to the alleged pollution through the emission of air contaminants to stop the emission of air pollutants causing or contributing to such pollution or to take such other action as may be necessary. If it is not practicable to assure prompt protection of the health of persons solely by commencement of such a civil action, the director, with the concurrence of the Governor, may issue such orders as may be necessary to protect the health of persons who are, or may be, affected by such pollution source or facility. Prior to issuing an order under this Code section, the director shall consult with local authorities in order to confirm the correctness of the information on which action proposed to be taken is based and to ascertain the action which such authorities are or will be taking. Notwithstanding Code Sections 12-9-12, 12-9-13, and 12-9-15, such order shall be immediately effective for a period of not more than 24 hours unless the director brings an action under the first sentence of this Code section before the expiration of such period. Whenever the director brings such an action within such period, such order shall be effective for a period of 48 hours or such longer period as may be authorized by the court pending litigation or thereafter.

(Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 15; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1.)

Cross references.

- Emergency powers of Governor generally,

§§

38-3-22

,

38-3-51

,

45-12-29

et seq.

12-9-15. Hearing; judicial review.

Any person who is aggrieved or adversely affected by any order or action of the director pursuant to this article shall, upon petition within 30 days after the issuance of such order or the taking of such action, have a right to a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the Board of Natural Resources. The hearing before the administrative law judge shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act." The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final decision of the board. Any party to the hearing, including the director, shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50. Such action shall be filed in the Superior Court of Fulton County or in the superior court of the county of residence of the petitioner.

The provisions of subparagraph (c)(2)(B) of Code Section 12-2-2 shall apply to proceedings under this Code section.

Persons are aggrieved or adversely affected where the challenged action has caused or will cause them injury in fact or where the injury is to an interest within the zone of interests to be protected or regulated by the director pursuant to this article. A person shall also be considered aggrieved or adversely affected solely for purposes of administrative and judicial review pursuant to this article if he actively participated in the public hearing and comment process and the director decided the matter adverse to his interest. A continuous and substantial involvement in the review process, including attendance at public hearings and submission in writing of specific objections to the permit as proposed and specific suggested permit conditions or limitations which the person believes are required to implement the provisions of this article, shall constitute active participation. In the event the director asserts in response to the petition before the administrative law judge that the petitioner is not aggrieved or adversely affected, the administrative law judge shall take evidence and hear arguments on this issue and thereafter make a ruling on this issue before continuing with the hearing. The burden of going forward with evidence on this issue shall rest with the petitioner. The hearing and review procedure provided in this Code section is to the exclusion of all other means of hearing or review.

(Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 17; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 818, § 2/SB 190.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "article" was substituted for "chapter" throughout this Code section.

12-9-16. Hearings and review.

Any order of a hearing officer issued after a hearing as provided in Code Section 12-9-15 or 12-9-22, or any order of the director issued under Code Section 12-9-13, 12-9-20, or 12-9-22, either:

Unappealed from, as provided in those Code sections; or

Affirmed or modified pursuant to judicial review provided by this article or Chapter 13 of Title 50 and from which no further review is taken may be filed as a final order by certified copy from the director, in the superior court of the county wherein the person resides, or if the person is a corporation in the county wherein the corporation maintains its principal place of business, or in the county wherein the violation occurred, whereupon the court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. Such judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same, as though the judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by such court.

(Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 18; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "article" was substituted for "chapter" in paragraph (2).

12-9-17. Legal assistance by Attorney General.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General to represent the director or designate some member of his staff to represent the director in all actions in connection with this article.

(Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 19; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1.)

12-9-18. Powers of Governor as to air quality control generally.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article relating to the authority, power, and responsibility of the Board of Natural Resources, department, division, or director, the Governor is authorized to designate air quality regions within the state as provided in 42 U.S.C. Section 7407(e); petition the President as provided in 42 U.S.C. Section 7410(f); make application to the administrator pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 7411(g); consent to waivers pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 7411(j); require measures to prevent economic disruption of employment pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 7425; redesignate areas of the state to allow maximum industrial development pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 7474; recommend variances pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 7475; designate organizations pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 7504; and to take such other specific acts required by governors under 42 U.S.C. Section 7401, et seq.; all subject to the Governor's power to delegate such authority by executive order or otherwise to the director.

(Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 21; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1.)

12-9-19. Protection of confidential information obtained by division.

Information relating to secret processes, devices, or methods of manufacture or production obtained by the division in the administration of this article shall be kept confidential; provided, however, reports on the nature and amounts of stationary source emissions obtained by the division shall be available for public inspection from the division. This Code section shall have no effect on the division's duty to provide such information to the administrator, or his agents or representatives, pursuant to the federal act.

(Code 1933, § 88-908, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 581, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1522, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 22; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1.)

12-9-20. Continuation in effect of rules, regulations, and permits.

To the extent that they are consistent with the provisions of this article, all rules and regulations issued by the department before July 1, 1992, shall continue in full force and effect.

Any permit issued by the department pursuant to this article before July 1, 1992, shall continue in effect until the permittee is required by law to obtain a new or amended permit.

(Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 23; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "article" was substituted for "chapter" throughout this Code section.

12-9-21. Effect of article on powers of Board of Natural Resources, department, division, and director.

Nothing contained in this article shall be deemed to grant to the Board of Natural Resources, department, division, or director any jurisdiction or authority to make any rule, regulation, recommendation, or determination or to enter any order:

With respect to air conditions existing solely within the property boundaries of commercial and industrial plants, works, or operations if such locations are not subject to regulation under the federal act;

Affecting the relations between employers and employees with respect to or arising out of any air conditions if such relations are not subject to regulation under the federal act; except that a source which uses a supplemental or intermittent control system for purposes of complying with an order issued by the director under Code Section 12-9-13 or the administrator under 42 U.S.C. Section 7413(d) may not temporarily reduce the pay of any employee by reason of the use of supplemental or intermittent or other dispersion dependent control systems for control of emissions of air pollutants;

Limiting or restricting the owners of any forest land from burning over their own land, provided that such burning is consistent with the requirements of the federal act; or

Limiting or restricting burning over any agricultural tract, lot, or parcel greater than five acres for purposes of any existing, expanded, or new agricultural operations as such term is defined by Code Section 1-3-3, provided that such burning is consistent with the requirements of the federal act and is limited to vegetative material.

(Code 1933, § 88-910, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 581, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1529; Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 7; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1; Ga. L. 2018, p. 118, § 1/HB 885.)